Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.83.040

Release from liability.

No liability is imposed by this chapter upon any authorized state, county, or municipal officer engaged in the lawful performance of his or her duties, or upon any person who reasonably believes that he or she is acting at the direction of such officer and that the officer is acting in the lawful performance of his or her duties.

[ 2011 c 336 s 409; 1992 c 210 s 4.]